Missouri, session 2026, HB3026.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
D
Section A. Chapter 50, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto three new sections, to be
known as sections 50.1351, 50.1356, and 50.1361, to read as follows:
50.1351. 1. As used in sections 50.1351 to 50.1361, the term "earnings tax"
H
means a tax on the following:
(1) Salaries, wages, commissions, and other compensation earned by a county's
residents; T
(2) Salaries, wages, commissions, and other compensation earned by
nonresidenIts of a county for work done or services performed or rendered in the
county;
W
(3) Net profits of associations, businesses, or other activities conducted by a
county's residents; and
(4) Net profits of associations, businesses, or other activities conducted in a
county by nonresidents of the county.
2. (1) As used in sections 50.1351 to 50.1361, the term "salaries, wages,
commissions, and other compensation" shall not be construed to include any
contributions to a deferred compensation plan including, but not limited to, a salary
reduction plan, a cafeteria plan, or any other similar plan deferring the receipt of
compensation by a resident or nonresident of a county if such contribution is not subject
to Missouri state income tax at the time such contribution is made.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3026 2
(2) The net profits or earnings of associations, businesses, other activities, and
corporations shall be ascertained and determined by deducting the necessary expenses
of operation from the gross profits or earnings.
(3) The earnings or net profits subject to tax of any nonresident individual, of
any association or business conducted by nonresidents, or of any corporation, in any
N
case in which the work done, services performed or rendered, and business or other
activities conducted are done, performed, rendered, or conducted both within and
without the county may be ascertained by formula as seWt forth in any ordinance enacted
under sections 50.1351 to 50.1361 or prescribed by rules or regulations adopted under
such ordinance.
3. The governing body of a county may, by order or ordinance, replace all taxes
A
levied and imposed on all real property and personal property by such county with an
earnings tax as provided in sections 50.1351 to 50.1361. No order or ordinance
replacing such property taxes with anR earnings tax shall become effective unless the
governing body of the county submits to the qualified voters of the county at a state
general, primary, or general municipal election a proposal to authorize the governing
D
body of the county to replace such property taxes with such earnings tax.
4. The question submitted shall be in substantially the following form: "Shall __
____ (insert county naHme) County replace all real property and personal property taxes
levied and imposed by the county with an earnings tax at a rate that will produce
substantially the same revenues as produced by the real and personal property taxes?".
T
5. If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the proposal, the order or ordinance shall be in effect. If a
majority oIf the votes cast by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the
Wproposal, the governing body of the county shall have no power to replace the property
taxes and impose the earnings tax unless and until the governing body of the county
submits another proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to replace the
property taxes and impose the earnings tax under sections 50.1351 to 50.1361 and such
proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting thereon.
50.1356. 1. The income received by any of the following shall not be taxable
under an earnings tax imposed under sections 50.1351 to 50.1361:
(1) A labor, agricultural, or horticultural organization;
(2) A mutual savings bank not having a capital stock represented by shares;
(3) A fraternal-beneficiary society, order, or association, operating under the
lodge system or for the exclusive benefit of the members of a fraternity itself operating
under the lodge system and providing for the payment of life, sick, accident, or other
benefits to the members of such society, order, or association or their dependents;

HB 3026 3
(4) A domestic building and loan association or credit union without capital
stock organized and operated for mutual purposes and without profit;
(5) A cemetery company owned and operated exclusively for the benefit of its
members, unless such cemetery company is operated for profit;
(6) A corporation or association organized and operated exclusively for
N
religious, charitable, scientific, or educational purposes, no part of the net income of
which inures to the benefit of any private stockholder or individual;
(7) A business league, chamber of commerce, or Wboard of trade not organized for
profit and no part of the net income of which inures to the benefit of any private
stockholder or individual;
(8) A civic league or organization not organized for profit but operated
A
exclusively for the promotion of social welfare;
(9) A club organized and operated exclusively for pleasure, recreation, and other
nonprofitable purposes, no part of theR net income of which inures to the benefit of any
private stockholder or member;
(10) A farmer or other mutual hail, cyclone, or fire insurance company, mutual
D
ditch or irrigation company, mutual or cooperative telephone company, or like
organization, the income of which consists solely of assessments, dues, and fees collected
from members for thHe sole purpose of meeting its expenses;
(11) A farmer, fruit grower, or like association, organized and operated as a sales
agent for the purpose of marketing the products of its members and turning back to
T
them the proceeds of sales, less the necessary selling expenses, on the basis of the
quantity of produce furnished by them;
(12I) A corporation or association organized for the exclusive purpose of holding
Wtitle to property, collecting income therefrom, and turning over the entire amount
thereof, less expenses, to an organization that itself is exempt from the tax imposed by
chapter 143;
(13) A federal land bank or national farm loan association, as provided in
section 26 of an Act of Congress approved July 17, 1916, entitled "An act to provide
capital for agricultural development, to create standard forms of investment based upon
farm mortgage, to equalize rates of interest upon farm loans, to furnish a market for
United States bonds, to create government depositaries and financial agents for the
United States, and for other purposes";
(14) A joint stock land bank as to income derived from bonds or debentures or
other joint stock land banks or any federal land bank belonging to such joint stock land
bank;

HB 3026 4
(15) An express company that now pays an annual tax on its gross receipts in this
state or an insurance company that pays an annual tax on its gross premium receipts in
this state; or
(16) A trust created by an employer and employees as part of a stock bonus,
pension, or profit-sharing plan, for the exclusive benefit of employees, to which
N
contributions are made by such employer or employees, or both, for the purpose of
distributing to such employees the earnings and principal of the fund accumulated by
the trust in accordance with such plan, or a trust cWonsisting solely of one or more
restricted retirement funds created for one or more self-employed persons as part of a
retirement plan for the exclusive benefit of such self-employed person or persons, to
which contributions are made by such self-employed person or persons, for the purpose
A
of distributing to such self-employed person or persons the earnings and principal of the
fund accumulated by the trust in accordance with such plan and the amount actually
distributed, or made available to any Rdistributee.
2. The following income shall be exempt from an earnings tax imposed under
sections 50.1351 to 50.1361:
D
(1) The proceeds of life insurance policies paid to the individual beneficiaries
upon the death of the insured;
(2) The amouHnt received by the insured as a return of premium or premiums
paid by the insured under life insurance or endowment contracts, either during the term
or at the maturity of the term mentioned in the contract or upon the surrender of the
T
contract;
(3) Any amount received under workers' compensation acts, as compensation
for personIal injuries or sickness, plus the amount of any damages received whether by
Wsuit or agreement on account of such injuries or sickness, or through the federal War
Risk Insurance Act or any law for the benefit or relief of injured or disabled members of
the Armed Forces of the United States;
(4) The value of property acquired by gift, bequest, devise, or descent, but the
income from such property shall be included as income;
(5) Interest upon the obligations of this state or of any political subdivision
thereof or upon the obligations of the United States or its possessions; or
(6) Any income derived from any public utility performing functions of national
government or those incident to the state or any political subdivision thereof, or from
the exercise of any essential government function accruing to any state, territory, or the
District of Columbia.

HB 3026 5
3. The governing body of a county may provide for deductions and exemptions
from salaries, wages, and commissions of employees and may provide for exemptions on
account of the spouses and dependents of such employees.
50.1361. 1. A county may impose upon employers the duty of collecting and
remitting to the county any earnings tax that may be levied upon the earnings of
N
employees under sections 50.1351 to 50.1361 and may prescribe penalties for failure to
perform such duty. In the event that such county imposes such duty on employers, each
such employer shall be entitled to deduct and retain oneW and one-half percent of the total
amount collected to compensate such employer for collecting such tax. The governing
body of any such county may, by order or ordinance, reduce, eliminate, or reimpose, if
eliminated, the fee allowed to employers by this subsection.
A
2. In order to facilitate the collection of the earnings tax authorized under
sections 50.1351 to 50.1361, such county may, by order or ordinance, create wage
brackets within which the earnings taRx shall be uniform for taxpayers entitled to the
same number of exemptions.
3. No earnings tax order or ordinance enacted under sections 50.1351 to 50.1361
D
shall require any taxpayer to file copies of such taxpayer's state or federal income tax
returns with any county officer, employee, or other person designated by such order or
ordinance to collect oHr otherwise administer such earnings tax.
✔
T
I
W